North Carolina statutes. Chapter 146. State Lands.
Article 8. Miscellaneous Provisions.

§ 146-31.
Right of appeal to Governor and Council of State.

The requesting agency, in the event of disagreement with a decision of the Department of Administration regarding the acquisition or disposition of land pursuant to the provisions of this Subchapter, shall have the right of appeal to the Governor and Council of State.

History.

1957, c. 584, s. 6; G.S., s. 146-113; 1959, c. 683, s. 1.

§ 146-32.
Exemptions as to leases, etc.

The Governor, acting with the approval of the Council of State, may adopt rules and regulations:

Exempting from any or all of the requirements of this Subchapter such classes of lease, rental, easement, and right-of-way transactions as he deems advisable; and

Authorizing any State agency to enter into and/or approve those classes of transactions exempted by such rules and regulations from the requirements of this Chapter.

No rule or regulation adopted under this section may exempt from the provisions of

G.S. 146-25.1

any class of lease or rental which has a duration of more than 21 days, unless the class of lease or rental:

Is a lease or rental necessitated by a fire, flood, or other disaster that forces the agency seeking the new lease or rental to cease use of real property;

Is a lease or rental necessitated because an agency had intended to move to new or renovated real property that was not completed when planned, but a lease or rental exempted under this subparagraph may not be for a period of more than six months; or

Is a lease or rental which requires a unique location or a location that adjoins or is in close proximity to an existing rental location.

No rule or regulation adopted pursuant to subsection (a) of this section may exempt any lease from the provisions of

G.S. 146-25(b)

or

G.S. 146-29(b)

or (c).

History.

1959, c. 683, s. 1; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1116, s. 97; 1985, c. 479, s. 173; 1999-252, s. 3; 1999-456, s. 38; 2016-94, s. 37.7(e).

§ 146-33.
State agencies to locate and mark boundaries of lands. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

Every State agency shall locate and identify, and shall mark and keep marked, the boundaries of all lands allocated to that agency or under its control. The Department of Administration shall locate and identify, and mark and keep marked, the boundaries of all State lands not allocated to or under the control of any other State agency. The chief administrative officer of every State agency is authorized to contract with the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety for the furnishing, upon such conditions as may be agreed upon from time to time between the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety and the chief administrative officer of that agency, of prison labor for use where feasible in the performance of these duties.

History.

1957, c. 584, s. 2; G.S., s. 143-145.1; 1959, c. 683, s. 1; 1967, c. 996, s. 13; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2012-83, s. 57; 2017-186, s. 2(rrrrrr).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), effective January 1, 2012, substituted “Division of Adult Correction of the Department of Public Safety” for “Department of Correction” twice in the last sentence.

Session Laws 2012-83, s. 57, effective June 26, 2012, twice deleted “State” preceding “Division of Adult Correction.”

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(rrrrrr), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” twice in the last sentence.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), effective January 1, 2023, substituted “Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” twice. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 146-33.
State agencies to locate and mark boundaries of lands. [Effective January 1, 2023]

Every State agency shall locate and identify, and shall mark and keep marked, the boundaries of all lands allocated to that agency or under its control. The Department of Administration shall locate and identify, and mark and keep marked, the boundaries of all State lands not allocated to or under the control of any other State agency. The chief administrative officer of every State agency is authorized to contract with the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction for the furnishing, upon such conditions as may be agreed upon from time to time between the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction and the chief administrative officer of that agency, of prison labor for use where feasible in the performance of these duties.

History.

1957, c. 584, s. 2; G.S., s. 143-145.1; 1959, c. 683, s. 1; 1967, c. 996, s. 13; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2012-83, s. 57; 2017-186, s. 2(rrrrrr); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), effective January 1, 2012, substituted “Division of Adult Correction of the Department of Public Safety” for “Department of Correction” twice in the last sentence.

Session Laws 2012-83, s. 57, effective June 26, 2012, twice deleted “State” preceding “Division of Adult Correction.”

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(rrrrrr), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” twice in the last sentence.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), effective January 1, 2023, substituted “Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” twice. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 146-34.
Agencies may establish agreed boundaries.

Every State agency may establish agreed boundaries between lands allocated to it or under its control, and the lands of any other owner, subject to the approval of the Governor and Council of State. The Department of Administration is authorized to establish agreed boundaries between State lands not allocated to or under the control of any other State agency and the lands of any other owner, subject to the approval of the Governor and Council of State. The Attorney General shall represent the State in all proceedings to establish boundaries which cannot be established by agreement.

History.

1957, c. 584, s. 3; G.S., s. 143-145.2; 1959, c. 683, s. 1.

§ 146-35.
Severance approval delegation.

The Governor, acting with the approval of the Council of State, may adopt rules and regulations delegating to any other State agency the authority to approve the severance of buildings and standing timber from State lands. Upon such approval of severance, the buildings or timber affected shall be, for the purposes of this Chapter, treated as personal property.

History.

1959, c. 683, s. 1.

§ 146-36.
Acquisitions for and conveyances to federal government.

The Governor and Council of State may, whenever they find that it is in the best interest of the State to do so, enter into any contract or other agreement which will be sufficient to comply with federal laws or regulations, binding the State to acquire for and to convey to the United States government land or any interest in land, and to do such other acts and things as may be necessary for such compliance.

The Governor and Council of State may authorize any conveyance to the United States government to be made upon nominal consideration whenever they deem it to be in the best interest of the State to do so.

History.

1959, c. 683, s. 1.